Utah statutes.
17-36-9.   Budget -- Financial plan -- Contents -- Municipal services and
capital projects funds.
(1) (a)  The budget for each fund shall provide a complete financial plan for
the budget period and shall contain in tabular form classified by the account
titles as required by the uniform system of budgeting, accounting, and
reporting:
(i)  estimates of all anticipated revenues;
(ii)  all appropriations for expenditures; and
(iii)  any additional data required by Section 17-36-10 or by the uniform
system of budgeting, accounting, and reporting.
(b)  The total of appropriated expenditures shall be equal to the total of
anticipated revenues.
(2) (a)  Each first-, second-, and third-class county that provides municipal-
type services under Section 17-34-1 shall:
(i)  establish a special revenue fund, "Municipal Services Fund," and a
capital projects fund, "Municipal Capital Projects Fund," or establish a local
district or special service district to provide municipal services; and
(ii)  budget appropriations for municipal services and municipal capital
projects from these funds.
(b)  The Municipal Services Fund is subject to the same budgetary requirements
as the county's general fund.
(c) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(c)(ii), the county may deposit
revenue derived from any taxes otherwise authorized by law, income derived
from the investment of money contained within the municipal services fund and
the municipal capital projects fund, the appropriate portion of federal money,
and fees collected into a municipal services fund and a municipal capital
projects fund.
(ii)  The county may not deposit revenue derived from a fee, tax, or other
source based upon a countywide assessment or from a countywide service or
function into a municipal services fund or a municipal capital projects fund.
(d)  The maximum accumulated unappropriated surplus in the municipal services
fund, as determined prior to adoption of the tentative budget, may not exceed
an amount equal to the total estimated revenues of the current fiscal period.
